South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4029.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-29-10(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) In all cases of known or suspected contagious or infectious diseases occurring within this State the attending physician must report these diseases to the county health department within twenty-four hours, stating the name and address of the patient and the nature of the disease. The county health department must report to the Department of Public Health and Environmental Control all such cases of infectious and contagious diseases as have been reported during the preceding month, these reports to be made upon blanks furnished by the Department of Public Health and Environmental Control. The Department of Public Health and Environmental Control must designate the diseases it considers contagious and infectious. The Department of Public Health and Environmental Control may also designate other diseases for mandatory reporting by physicians to include alpha-gal syndrome, which must be reported. Any physician who fails to comply with the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than one hundred dollars or be imprisoned for a period not exceeding thirty days. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----